src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON VIESSOMUJ !!= @CODE@ gen:viessumuhá
                           +N+Sg+Nom:uj%>        K                    ;
                           +N+Sg+Gen:uhá%>       K                    ;
                           +N+Sg+Acc:uhá%>v      K                    ;
                           +N+Sg+Ine:uhá%>n      K                    ;
                           +N+Sg+Ela:uhá%>s      K                    ;
                  +Err/Orth+N+Sg+Com:uhá%>jna    K                    ; !
                           +N+Sg+Com:uhá%>jn     K                    ;
                                  +N:uhá%>       ILL-EVENCASE         ;
                           +N+Pl+Nom:uhá%>       K                    ;
                           +N+Pl+Gen:uhá%>j      K                    ;
                           +N+Pl+Acc:uhá%>jt     K                    ;
                           +N+Pl+Ill:uhá%>jda    K                    ;
                           +N+Pl+Ine:uhá%>jn     K                    ;
                           +N+Pl+Ela:uhá%>js     K                    ;
                           +N+Pl+Com:uhá%>j      K                    ;
                           +N+Sg+Nom:uhá%>       PxV                  ; !
                           +N+Sg+Gen:uhá%>       PxV                  ; !
                           +N+Sg+Acc:uhá%>       PxV                  ; !
                           +N+Sg+Ine:uhá%>n%>    PxC                  ; !
                           +N+Sg+Ela:uhá%>st%>   PxC                  ; !
                           +N+Sg+Com:uhá%>jn%>   PxC                  ; !
                           +N+Pl+Acc:uhá%>jd%>   PxC                  ; !
                           +N+Pl+Ine:uhá%>jn%>   PxC                  ; !
                           +N+Pl+Ela:uhá%>jst%>  PxC                  ; !
                              +N+Ess:uhá%>n      K                    ;
                              +N+Abe:uhá%>Q1dak  K                    ;
                              +N+Abe:uhá%>Q1da   K                    ;
                           +N+Sg+Abe:uhá%>#dagi  K                    ;
                           +N+Sg+Abe:uhá%>#dagá  K                    ;
                  +Err/Orth+N+Sg+Abe:uhá%>#tagá  K                    ;
                           +N+Pl+Abe:uhá%>j#dagi K                    ;
                           +N+Pl+Abe:uhá%>j#dagá K                    ;
                  +Err/Orth+N+Pl+Abe:uhá%>j#tagá K                    ;
                                  +N:uhá»        DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
                        +N+Cmp/SgNom:uj%>        R                    ;
                        +N+Cmp/SgGen:uhá%>Q1     R                    ;
                        +N+Cmp/PlGen:uhá%>Q1j    R                    ;
! +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Attr:#»ahtes%> ATTR ; Only for odd-syllble stems
!              +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+Adv:#»ahtá%>    K                    ;
!              +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+Adv:#»ahti%>    K                    ;
!         +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom:#»ahtes%>   K                    ;
!         +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom:#»ahttá%>   PxV                  ; !
!            +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Ess:#»ahttá%>n  K                    ;
! +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Der5+Der/vuota:#»ahtes     VUOHTA               ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
!                +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A:#»ahttá%>   ILL-EVENCASE         ;
!                +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A:#»ahttá%>   N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
!                +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A:#»ahttá%>   BU/MUS               ;

!!€gt-norm: bårråmuj # Even-syllable test
!!€ bårråmuj:                 bårråmuj+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ bårråmuháj:                 bårråmuj+N+Sg+Ill




!! !4 syllable plurals
! - - - - - -
