src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx
bårråmuj+Sem/Food:bårråm VIESSOMUJ ;
dahkamuj+Sem/Semcon:dahkam VIESSOMUJ ;
gierddamuj+Sem/Dummytag:gierddam VIESSOMUJ ;
juhkamuj+Sem/Drink:juhkam VIESSOMUJ ;
låhkåmuj+Sem/Txt:låhkåm VIESSOMUJ ;
viessomuj+Sem/Dummytag:viessom VIESSOMUJ ;
